New Mexico, session 2026, HB327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of the Oil and Gas Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] ADDITIONAL DUTIES OF DIVISION--PRODUCED WATER DISPOSAL WELLS--PERMIT REVIEW TIME PERIOD.--The division shall promulgate rules relating to produced water disposal wells that require the division: A. within thirty days after receipt of an application for a permit for a produced water disposal well, to review the application, determine whether it is administratively complete and notify the applicant; B. if an application is deemed incomplete, to notify the applicant in writing and describe the specific information necessary to complete the application. The: (1) applicant shall have thirty days from notice of incomplete application to submit a supplemental filing to complete an application; (2) applicant may submit up to two supplemental filings to complete an application; (3) permit review time period shall restart each time the division receives a supplemental filing; and (4) division shall deny the application if the second supplemental filing is deemed incomplete, and the applicant may submit a new application; and C. within fifteen days after the division deems an application for a permit for a produced water disposal well complete, to grant, grant subject to conditions or deny the permit for a produced water disposal well. If the division fails to act on a complete application within fifteen days, the permit shall be deemed granted." - 2 -